Colorado, session 2026A, SB029.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-22-131 as
follows:
39-22-131. Tax credit for contributions to a health savings
account - high deductible insurance plan - tax preference
performance statement - legislative declaration - repeal.
(1) (a) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT THE PURPOSE OF THE TAX EXPENDITURE CREATED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION IS TO PROVIDE TAX RELIEF TO CERTAIN
INDIVIDUALS BY PROVIDING A FINANCIAL INCENTIVE FOR MAKING A
CONTRIBUTION TO A HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT.
(b) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR, IN
CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, SHALL MEASURE THE
EFFECTIVENESS OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION BY
DETERMINING THE INCREASE IN CONTRIBUTIONS TO HEALTH SAVINGS
ACCOUNTS DUE TO THE CREDIT.
(2) FOR INCOME TAX YEARS COMMENCING ON OR AFTER JANUARY
1, 2027, BUT PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2033, A RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL WHO
-2- SB26-029

CONTRIBUTES TO A HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT THAT SUPPORTS A HIGH
DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH INSURANCE PLAN AS DEFINED IN 26 U.S.C. SEC. 223
(c)(2), INCLUDING A QUALIFYING HIGH DEDUCTIBLE HEALTH INSURANCE
PLAN ISSUED BY AN EXCHANGE ESTABLISHED UNDER THE COLORADO
HEALTH BENEFIT EXCHANGE CREATED IN ARTICLE 22 OF TITLE 10, IS
ALLOWED, SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION, A CREDIT
AGAINST THE INCOME TAXES IMPOSED BY THIS ARTICLE 22 IN AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO TWENTY-FIVE PERCENT OF THE AMOUNT CONTRIBUTED TO THE
HEALTH SAVINGS ACCOUNT DURING THE TAXABLE YEAR FOR WHICH THE
CREDIT IS CLAIMED.
(3) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION SHALL NOT EXCEED:
(a) FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR A SINGLE FILER;
(b) ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR JOINT FILERS; AND
(c) ONE THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR CONTRIBUTIONS
TO A FAMILY HEALTH PLAN, WHETHER THE CONTRIBUTION IS BY A SINGLE
FILER OR JOINT FILERS.
(4) IF THE CREDIT ALLOWED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION EXCEEDS
THE INCOME TAXES DUE ON THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S INCOME, THE
AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT NOT USED TO OFFSET INCOME TAXES IS NOT
CARRIED FORWARD AS TAX CREDITS AGAINST THE RESIDENT INDIVIDUAL'S
SUBSEQUENT YEARS' INCOME TAX LIABILITY AND IS NOT REFUNDED TO THE
INDIVIDUAL.
(5) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2037.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
-3- SB26-029

12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- SB26-029